Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1154.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1725-E of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1725-E. Department of Health.* * *(d) Mobile application.--(1) The department, in consultation with the Department of Human Services and the Insurance Department, shall implement and administer a mobile application to:(i) Promote awareness of health programs in this Commonwealth regarding pregnancy, prenatal care, postpartum care, newborn care and infant care.(ii) Increase participation in the health programs described in paragraph (1) by eligible individuals, with an emphasis on those individuals who receive or are eligible for Medicaid or medical assistance.(iii) Provide general information regarding Medicaid eligibility and medical assistance eligibility as they relate to pregnancy, prenatal care, postpartum care, newborn care and infant care.(2) Within 90 days of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall develop a competitive bidding process in accordance with State law and a request for proposal, seeking a mobile application vendor that can partner with the department to implement and administer a mobile application in accordance with this subsection. In 20250HB1154PN1278 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 considering bids from mobile application vendors, the department shall, as much as practicable, give priority to a mobile application vendor that already reaches, or has experience in reaching, mothers and expectant mothers who receive or are eligible for Medicaid or medical assistance.(3) The department is authorized to contract with a mobile application vendor to implement and administer a mobile application in accordance with this subsection, which must operate on a Statewide basis and must:(i) Have the capability to deliver education, resources and support to prenatal and postpartum individuals and their families, including information specific to this Commonwealth, such as links to programs of the department and other State agencies and resources available to prenatal and postpartum individuals.(ii) Demonstrate a consistent workflow to increase awareness of programs and resources available to users of the mobile application.(iii) Provide information in multiple languages.(iv) Be made available on Android and iOS platforms.(4) The platform for the mobile application under this subsection must be able to survey a mobile application user's specific questions, in accordance with standards determined by the department.(5) The mobile application vendor selected in accordance with this subsection shall:(i) Include information and resources in the mobile application that meet acceptable clinical standards, including standards specified by:(A) The Centers for Disease Control and 20250HB1154PN1278 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Prevention.(B) T he National Institutes of Health. (C) The American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists.(D) The American Medical Association.(E) The American Academy of Pediatrics.(ii) R egularly provide to the department, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, aggregate and de-identified data concerning:(A) T he number of users of the mobile application that are eligible for Medicaid or medical assistance.(B) The number of users of the mobile application that are engaging with Pennsylvania-specific content.(C) The number of users of the mobile application seeking additional information about eligibility for Medicaid or medical assistance or about other available resources.(D) The number of monthly users of the mobile application.(E) The number of daily users of the mobile application.(F) The average length of time that a user uses the mobile application.(G) Any other information requested by the department.(6) Payment to the mobile application vendor selected in accordance with this subsection shall be based on a $10 per member per month fee for each user of the mobile application 20250HB1154PN1278 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the customized application for this Commonwealth.(7) The total payment to the mobile application vendor may not exceed $500,000 annually, but the number of users of the mobile application shall not be capped.(8) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth." Medicaid." The Federal medical assistance program established under Title XIX."Medical assistance." The State program of medical assistance established under the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code."Title XIX." Title XIX of the Social Security Act (49 Stat. 620, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1154PN1278 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617